en: Compost aerator design: Claw; Corkscrew; Drill attachment; Plunger; Spike; T-handle fork; Wing-turn; Other
pt-PT: Design do arejador de compostagem: Garra; Saca-rolhas; Acessório para broca; Êmbolo; Espigão; Garfo com pega em T; Rotação com asas; Outro
lt-LT: Komposto aeratoriaus dizainas: Letena; Kamščiatraukis; Gręžimo antgalis; Santechninė pompa; Smaigalys; T formos rankenos šakutė; Sparno pasukimas; Kita
fi: Kompostin ilmastointityökalun malli: Koura; Korkkiruuvi; Porakiinnitys; Viemäripumppu; Piikki; T-kahvahaarukka; Kääntyvä siipimalli; Muu
vi: Thiết kế máy sục khí phân ủ: Vấu; Đồ mở nắp chai; Phụ kiện gắn máy khoan; Chốt đẩy; Gai; Nĩa tay cầm chữ T; Khóa vặn cánh chuồn; Khác
cs: Konstrukce provzdušňovače kompostu: Dráp; Vývrtka; Nástavec na vrtačku; Duté hroty; Bodce; Vidle s násadou T; Ruční promíchávač kompostu s lopatkami; Jiné
pl: Konstrukcja aeratora kompostu: Pazur; Świder; Nasadka do wiertarki; Tłok; Kolec; Widły z uchwytem T; Pokrętło skrzydełkowe; Pozostałe
da: Kompostlufters design: Klo; Proptrækker; Boretilbehør; Svupper; Pig; Gaffel med T-håndtag; Wing-turn; Andet
fr: Conception de l’aérateur de compost: Griffe; Tire-bouchon; Aérateur de compost à vis; Plongeur; Pointe; Aérateur de compost en T; Aérateur à ailettes rotatives; Autre
el: Σχεδιασμός αεριστήρα κομποστοποίησης: Τύπου claw; Τύπου τιρμπουσόν; Εξάρτημα για δράπανο; Τύπου εμβόλου; Ακίδα; Πιρούνι με λαβή τύπου T; Αεριστήρας τύπου πτερυγίων (περιστροφικός); Άλλο
it: Design dell'aeratore per compost: Pinza; Cavatappi; Attacco per trapano; A stantuffo; Punta; Forchetta con impugnatura a T; Ala girevole; Altro
ja: コンポストエアレーターのデザイン: クロウ; コルク栓抜き; ドリルアタッチメント; プランジャー; スパイク; T型ハンドルフォーク; ウィングターン; その他
th: การออกแบบเครื่องเติมอากาศสำหรับปุ๋ยหมัก: แบบกรงเล็บ; แบบเกลียวหมุน; แบบหัวต่อสว่าน; แบบลูกสูบ; แบบปลายแหลม; แบบคราดด้ามตัวที; แบบหมุนด้วยปีก; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Дизайн на аератор за компост: Тип „нокът“; Тип „тирбушон“; Приставка за бормашина; Бутало; Шип; Вилица с T–образна дръжка; Въртящо се крило; Друго
tr: Kompost havalandırıcı tasarımı: Pençe; Tirbuşon; Matkap ucu; Dalıcı piston; Sivri uç; T-saplı çatal; Kanatlı döner tip; Diğer
zh-TW: 堆肥曝氣機設計: 鉤爪式; 螺旋式; 鑽頭配件; 柱塞泵; 尖頭; T 型把手叉; 翼轉彎; 其他
sv: Kompostluftarens design: Klo; Korkskruv; Borrtillbehör; Kolv; Pigg; T-användarnamn gaffel; Vingvridning; Övrigt
sl-SI: Zasnova kompostnega prezračevalnika: Bruce; Zamašek; Priključek za vrtanje; Odmaševalnik odtokov; Konica; Vilice s T-ročajem; Zavoj krila; Druga
nb: Kompostlufterdesign: Klo; Korketrekker; Boretilbehør; Stempel; Pigg; T-referansegaffel; Vingsving; Annet
ko: 퇴비 통기기 설계: 클로; 코르크 따개; 드릴 부착 장치; 플런저; 스파이크; T-핸들 포크; 윙턴; 기타
zh-CN: 堆肥通气器设计: 爪式; 螺旋式; 电钻附件式; 活塞式; 尖桩式; T 形手柄叉式; 翼旋式; 其他
ru: Конструкция мешалки для компоста: Лапчатая; Штопорная; Насадка для дрели; Поршневая; Штыревая; Вилка с Т-образной рукояткой; Барашковый винт; Другая
es: Diseño de aireador de compost: Garra; Sacacorchos; Accesorio para hacer agujeros; Desatascador; Punta de clavo; Horquilla identificadora en T; Ala de giro; Otros
pt-BR: Design do aerador de compostagem: Garra; Saca rolhas; Acessório de furadeira; Pistão; Espigão; Garfo com alça em T; Trava borboleta; Outro
sk-SK: Konštrukcia prevzdušňovača kompostu: Pazúrový; Vývrtka; Nadstavec na vŕtačku; Inštalatérsky zvon; Hrot; Vidlica s rúčkou v tvare T; Otočný s krídlami; Iné
ro-RO: Proiectarea aeratorului de compost: Cu gheare; Tip tirbușon; Accesoriu pentru bormașină; Tip piston; Cu vârf; Furculiță cu mâner în T; Cu aripi rabatabile; Altele
hu: Komposzt levegőztető kialakítása: Karmos; Dugóhúzó; Fúrótartozék; Dugattyú; Tüske; T-fogantyús villa; Szárnyas; Egyéb
hr-HR: Dizajn aeratora za kompost: Kandža; Vadičep; Nastavak za bušilicu; Odčepljivač; Šiljak; Vila s T-ručkom; Okretna krilca; Ostalo
nl: Ontwerp van een compostbeluchter: Klauw; Kurketrekker; Booropzetstuk; Stamper; Pin; T-handvat vork; Vleugeldraai; Overig
de: Design für Kompostbelüfter: M-Anker; Korkenzieher; Bohraufsatz; Saugglocke; Dorn; T-Griff-Gabel; Flügeldrehung; Sonstiges